North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 1A. Collection and Refund of Fees and Taxes.

§ 106-9.2.
Records and reports required of persons paying fees or taxes to Commissioner or Department; examination of records; determination of amount due by Commissioner in case of noncompliance.

Every person paying fees or taxes to the Commissioner of Agriculture or to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services under the provisions of this Chapter shall keep such records as the Commissioner may prescribe to indicate accurately the fees or taxes due to the Commissioner or Department, and such records shall be preserved for a period of three years, and shall at all times during the business hours of the day be subject to inspection by the Commissioner or his deputies or such other agents as may be duly authorized by the Commissioner. Any person failing to comply with or violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Agriculture, by competent auditors, to have the books and records of every person paying fees or taxes to the Commissioner or Department examined at least once each year to determine if such persons are keeping complete records as provided by this section, and to determine if correct reports have been made to the Commissioner or Department covering the total amount of fees or taxes due by such persons.

If any person shall fail, neglect or refuse to keep such records or to make such reports or pay fees or taxes due as required, and within the time provided in this Chapter, the Commissioner shall immediately inform himself as best he may as to the matters and things required to be set forth in such records and reports, and from such information as he may be able to obtain, determine and fix the amount of fees or taxes due the State from such delinquent person for the period covering the delinquency. The Commissioner shall proceed immediately to collect the fees or taxes due the State, including any penalties and interest thereon, in the manner provided in this Article.

History.

1963, c. 458; 1993, c. 539, s. 736; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-9.3.
Procedure for assessment of fees and taxes.

If the Commissioner of Agriculture discovers from the examination of any report filed by a taxpayer or otherwise that any fee or tax or additional fee or tax is due from any taxpayer, he shall give notice to the taxpayer in writing of the kind and amount of fee or tax which is due and of his intent to assess the same, which notice shall contain advice to the effect that unless application for a rehearing is made within the time specified in subsection (c), the proposed assessment will become conclusive and final.If the Commissioner is unable to obtain from the taxpayer adequate and reliable information upon which to base such assessment, the assessment may be made upon the basis of the best information available and, subject to the provisions hereinafter made, such assessment shall be deemed correct.

The notice required to be given in subsection (a) may be delivered to the taxpayer by an agent of the Commissioner or may be sent by mail to the last known address of the taxpayer and such notice will be deemed to have been received in due course of the mail unless the taxpayer shall make an affidavit to the contrary within 90 days after such notice is mailed, in which event the taxpayer shall be heard by the Commissioner in all respects as if he had made timely application.

Any taxpayer who objects to a proposed assessment of fee or tax or additional fee or tax shall be entitled to a hearing before the Commissioner of Agriculture, provided application therefor is made in writing within 30 days after the mailing or delivery of the notice required by subsection (a). If application for a hearing is made in due time, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall set a time and place for the hearing and after considering the taxpayer’s objections shall give written notice of his decision to the taxpayer. The amount of fee or tax or additional fee or tax due from the taxpayer as finally determined by the Commissioner shall thereupon be assessed and upon assessment shall become immediately due and collectible.Provided, the taxpayer may request the Commissioner at any time within 30 days of notice of such proposed assessment for a written statement, or transcript, of the information and the evidence upon which the proposed assessment is based, and the Commissioner of Agriculture shall furnish such statement, or transcript, to the taxpayer. Provided, further, after request by the taxpayer for such written statement, or transcript, the taxpayer shall have 30 days after the receipt of the same from the Commissioner of Agriculture to apply in writing for such hearing, explaining in detail his objections to such proposed assessment. If no request for such hearing is so made, such proposed assessment shall be final and conclusive.

If no timely application for a hearing is made within 30 days after notice of a proposed assessment of fee or tax or additional fee or tax is given pursuant to subsection (a), such proposed fee or tax or additional fee or tax assessment shall become final without further notice and shall be immediately due and collectible.

Where a proper report has been filed by a taxpayer and in the absence of fraud, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall assess any fee or tax or additional fee or tax due from the taxpayer within three years after the date upon which such report is filed or within three years after the date upon which such report was required by law to be filed, whichever is the later. If no report has been filed, and in the absence of fraud, any fee or tax or additional fee or tax due from a taxpayer may be assessed at any time within five years after the date upon which such report was required by law to be filed. In the event a false and fraudulent report has been filed or there has been an attempt in any manner to fraudulently defeat or evade a fee or tax, any fee or tax or additional fee or tax due from the taxpayer may be assessed at any time.

Except as hereinafter provided in subsection (g), the Commissioner of Agriculture shall have no authority to assess any fee or tax or additional fee or tax under this section until the notice required by subsection (a) shall have been given and the period within which an application for a hearing may be filed has expired, or if a timely application for a hearing if filed, until written notice of the Commissioner’s decision has been given to the taxpayer, provided, however that if the notice required by subsection (a) shall be mailed or delivered within the limitation prescribed in subsection (e), such limitation shall be deemed to have been complied with and the proceeding may be carried forward to its conclusion.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall have authority at any time within the applicable period of limitations to proceed at once to assess any fee or tax or additional fee or tax which he finds is due from a taxpayer if, in his opinion, the collection of such fee or tax is in jeopardy and immediate assessment is necessary in order to protect the interest of the State, provided, however, that if an assessment is made pursuant to the authority set forth in this subsection before the notice required by subsection (a) is given, such assessment shall not be valid unless the notice required by subsection (a) shall be given within 30 days after the date of such assessment.

All assessments of fees or taxes or additional fees or taxes (exclusive of penalties assessed thereon) shall bear interest at the rate of one half of one percent (0.5%) per month or fraction thereof from the time said fees or taxes or additional fees or taxes were due to have been paid until paid.

History.

1963, c. 458.

§ 106-9.4.
Collection of delinquent fees and taxes.

If any fee or tax imposed by this Chapter, or any other fee or tax levied by the State and payable to the Commissioner of Agriculture or the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, or any portion of such fee or tax, be not paid within 30 days after the same becomes due and payable, and after the same has been assessed, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall issue an order under his hand and official seal, directed to the sheriff of any county of the State commanding him to levy upon and sell the real and personal property of the taxpayer found within his county for the payment of the amount thereof, with the added penalties, additional taxes, interest, and cost of executing the same, and to return to the Commissioner of Agriculture the money collected by virtue thereof within a time to be therein specified, not less than 60 days from the date of the order. The said sheriff shall, thereupon, proceed upon the same in all respects with like effect and in the same manner prescribed by law in respect to executions issued against property upon judgments of a court of record, and shall be entitled to the same fees for his services in executing the order, to be collected in the same manner.

Bank deposits, rents, salaries, wages, and all other choses in action or property incapable of manual levy or delivery, hereinafter called the intangible, belonging, owing, or to become due to any taxpayer subject to any of the provisions of this Chapter, or which has been transferred by such taxpayer under circumstances which would permit it to be levied upon if it were tangible, shall be subject to attachment or garnishment as herein provided, and the person owing said intangible, matured or unmatured, or having same in his possession or control, hereinafter called the garnishee, shall become liable for all sums due by the taxpayer under this Chapter to the extent of the amount of the intangible belonging, owing, or to become due to the taxpayer subject to the setoff of any matured or unmatured indebtedness of the taxpayer to the garnishee. To effect such attachment or garnishment the Commissioner of Agriculture shall serve or cause to be served upon the taxpayer and the garnishee a notice as hereinafter provided, which notice may be served by any deputy or employee of the Commissioner of Agriculture or by any officer having authority to serve summonses. Said notice shall show:

The name of the taxpayer and his address, if known;

The nature and amount of the fee or tax, and the interest and penalties thereon, and the year or years for which the same were levied or assessed, and

Shall be accompanied by a copy of this subsection, and thereupon the procedure shall be as follows:If the garnishee has no defense to offer or no setoff against the taxpayer, he shall, within 10 days after service of said notice, answer the same by sending to the Commissioner of Agriculture by registered mail a statement to that effect, and if the amount due or belonging to the taxpayer is then due or subject to his demand, it shall be remitted to the Commissioner with said statement, but if said amount is to mature in the future, the statement shall set forth that fact and the same shall be paid to the Commissioner upon maturity, and any payment by the garnishee hereunder shall be a complete extinguishment of any liability therefor on his part to the taxpayer. If the garnishee has any defense or setoff, he shall state the same in writing under oath, and, within 10 days after service of said notice, shall send two copies of said statement to the Commissioner by registered mail; if the Commissioner admits such defense or setoff, he shall so advise the garnishee in writing within 10 days after receipt of such statement and the attachment or garnishment shall thereupon be discharged to the amount required by such defense or setoff, and any amount attached or garnished hereunder which is not affected by such defense or setoff shall be remitted to the Commissioner as above provided in cases where the garnishee has no defense or setoff, and with like effect. If the Commissioner shall not admit the defense or setoff, he shall set forth in writing his objections thereto and shall send a copy thereof to the garnishee within 10 days after receipt of the garnishee’s statement, or within such further time as may be agreed on by the garnishee, and at the same time he shall file a copy of said notice, a copy of the garnishee’s statement, and a copy of his objections thereto in the superior court of the county where the garnishee resides or does business where the issues made shall be tried as in civil actions.If judgment is entered in favor of the Commissioner of Agriculture by default or after hearing, the garnishee shall become liable for the fee or taxes, interest and penalties due by the taxpayer to the extent of the amount over and above any defense or setoff of the garnishee belonging, owing, or to become due to the taxpayer, but payments shall not be required from amounts which are to become due to the taxpayer until the maturity thereof, nor shall more than ten percent (10%) of any taxpayer’s salary or wages be required to be paid hereunder in any one month. The garnishee may satisfy said judgment upon paying said amount, and if he fails to do so, execution may issue as provided by law. From any judgment or order entered upon such hearing either the Commissioner of Agriculture or the garnishee may appeal as provided by law. If, before or after judgment, adequate security is filed for the payment of said taxes, interest, penalties, and costs, the attachment or garnishment may be released or execution stayed pending appeal, but the final judgment shall be paid or enforced as above provided. The taxpayer’s sole remedies to question his liability for said fees or taxes, interest, and penalties shall be those provided in this Article, as now or hereinafter amended or supplemented. If any third person claims any intangible attached or garnished hereunder and his lawful right thereto, or to any part thereof, is shown to the Commissioner, he shall discharge the attachment or garnishment to the extent necessary to protect such right, and if such right is asserted after the filing of said copies as aforesaid, it may be established by interpleader as now or hereafter provided by the General Statutes in cases of attachment and garnishment. In case such third party has no notice of proceedings hereunder, he shall have the right to file his petition under oath with the Commissioner at any time within 12 months after said intangible is paid to him and if the Commissioner finds that such party is lawfully entitled thereto or to any part thereof, he shall pay the same to such party as provided for refunds by

G.S. 105-407

and if such payment is denied, said party may appeal from the determination of the Commissioner to the Superior Court of Wake County or to the superior court of the county wherein he resides or does business. The intangibles of a taxpayer shall be paid or collected hereunder only to the extent necessary to satisfy said fees or taxes, interest, penalties, and costs. Except as hereinafter set forth, the remedy provided in this section shall not be resorted to unless a warrant for collection or execution against the taxpayer has been returned unsatisfied: Provided, however, if the Commissioner is of opinion that the only effective remedy is that herein provided, it shall not be necessary that a warrant for collection or execution shall be first returned unsatisfied, and in no case shall it be a defense to the remedy herein provided that a warrant for collection or execution has not been first returned unsatisfied: Provided, however, that no salary or wage at the rate of less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) per month, whether paid weekly or monthly, shall be attached or garnished under the provisions of this section.

In addition to the remedy herein provided, the Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized and empowered to make a certificate setting forth the essential particulars relating to the said fee or tax, including the amount thereof, the date when the same was due and payable, the person, firm, or corporation chargeable therewith, and the nature of the fee or tax, and under his hand and seal transmit the same to the clerk of the superior court of any county in which the delinquent taxpayer resides or has property; whereupon, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the superior court of the county to docket the said certificate and index the same on the cross index of judgments, and execution may issue thereon with the same force and effect as an execution upon any other judgment of the superior court; said tax shall become a lien on realty only from the date of the docketing of such certificate in the office of the clerk of the superior court and in personalty only from the date of the levy on such personalty and upon execution thereon no homestead or personal property exemption shall be allowed.

The remedies herein given are cumulative and in addition to all other remedies provided by law for the collection of said fees and taxes.

History.

1963, c. 458; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-9.5.
Refund of overpayment.

If the Commissioner of Agriculture discovers from the examination of any report, or otherwise, that any taxpayer has overpaid the correct amount of any fee or tax (including penalties, interest and costs, if any), such overpayment shall be refunded to the taxpayer within 60 days after it is ascertained together with interest thereon at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum: Provided, that interest on any such refund shall be computed from a date 90 days after date tax was originally paid by the taxpayer. Provided, further, that demand for such refund is made by the taxpayer within three years from the date of such overpayment or the due date of the report, whichever is later.

History.

1963, c. 458.

§ 106-9.6.
Suits to prevent collection prohibited; payment under protest and recovery of fee or tax so paid.

No court of this State shall entertain a suit of any kind brought for the purpose of preventing the collection of any fee or tax imposed in this Chapter. Whenever a person shall have a valid defense to the enforcement of the collection of a fee or tax assessed or charged against him or his property, such person shall pay such fee or tax to the proper officer, and notify such officer in writing that he pays the same under protest. Such payment shall be without prejudice to any defense or rights he may have in the premises, and he may, at any time within 30 days after such payment, demand the same in writing from the Commissioner of Agriculture; and if the same shall not be refunded within 90 days thereafter, may sue such official in the courts of the State for the amount so demanded. Such suit must be brought in the Superior Court of Wake County, or in the county in which the taxpayer resides.

History.

1963, c. 458.